Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202628-311.04
Stalking; violations; penalties.

A violation of section 28-311.03 is a Class IIIA felony.

Laws 1992, LB 1098, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 299, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 23;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 16;

Laws 2017, LB289, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 28;

Laws 2026, LB935, § 18.
July 18, 2026